Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,136
Nail technology temporary practitioner; expiration of license; extension.

A license as a nail technology temporary practitioner shall be granted for a set period of time and cannot be renewed. The license shall expire eight weeks following the date of issuance or upon receipt of examination results, whichever occurs first. The license of a temporary practitioner who fails to take the first scheduled examination shall expire immediately unless the department finds that the temporary practitioner was unable to attend the examination due to an emergency or other valid circumstances. If the department so finds, it may extend the license for an additional eight weeks or until receipt of the examination results, whichever occurs first. No license may be extended in such manner more than once for each temporary practitioner.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 43;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,195;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 398.